Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Juvenile Justice Act
§ 14-6-216.
Appointment of guardian ad litem.

The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is a party to proceedings under this act if the child has no parent, guardian or custodian appearing in his behalf or if the interests of the parents, guardian or custodian are adverse to the best interest of the child. A party to the proceeding or employee or representative thereof shall not be appointed guardian ad litem for the child.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.17; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-117; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of guardian ad litem, see Rule 17(c), W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

County responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees. —

A guardian ad litem, appointed pursuant to this section because the interests of the juvenile party's mother were adverse to the interests of the juvenile party, should have been paid by the county for service as a guardian ad litem, and not by the public defender; public defender is responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees only when one is appointed to provide additional representation on the delinquency allegation pursuant to §

7-6-109

.Munker v. Juvenile Court, Seventh Judicial Dist., 837 P.2d 676,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1992).

Remedy for failure to set hearing. —

The proper remedy for a failure to set an adjudicatory hearing within the time constraints of §§

14-6-209

and

14-6-226

is a motion to the juvenile court for a prompt hearing brought by the minor through the guardian ad litem, or brought by the parents, guardians or custodian named in the petition as parties to the proceeding; if such a motion is not acted upon in a timely fashion, then a petition for a writ of habeas corpus may be filed in the supreme court seeking release of the minor. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

Ct v. State, 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(2006).

§ 14-6-217.
Subpoenas for witnesses and evidence.

Upon application of any party to the proceeding, the clerk shall issue and the court on its own motion may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of records, documents or other tangible evidence at any hearing.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.18; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-118; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to subpoenas generally, see Rule 17, W.R. Cr. P.

§ 14-6-218.
Search warrant; when authorized; affidavit required; contents of affidavit and warrant; service and return.

The court or a commissioner may issue a search warrant within the court’s jurisdiction if it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that there is probable cause to believe a child has committed a delinquent act and the child is in hiding to avoid service of process or being taken into custody, or it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that there is probable cause to believe a child has committed a delinquent act.

The affidavit shall be in writing, signed and affirmed by the affiant. The affidavit shall set forth:

The name and age of the child sought, provided that if the name or age of the child is unknown the affidavit shall set forth a description of the child sufficient to identify him with reasonable certainty and a statement that the affiant believes the child is of age to come within the provisions of this act; and

The affiant’s belief that the child sought has committed a delinquent act and is in hiding to avoid service of process or being taken into custody, and a statement of the facts upon which the belief is based.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

The warrant may be directed to any law enforcement officer of the county or municipality in which the place or premises to be searched is located. The warrant shall:

Name or describe the child sought;

Name the address or location and describe the place or premises to be searched;

State the grounds for issuance of the warrant;

Name the person or persons whose affidavit has been taken in support of the warrant; and

Authorize the officer to whom the warrant is directed to conduct the search and instruct him as to the disposition of the child if found, pending further proceedings by the court.

The officer making the search may enter the place or premises described in the warrant at any time with force if necessary, in order to remove the child or to obtain evidence that a delinquent act has been committed. The officer conducting the search shall serve a copy of the warrant upon the person in possession of the place or premises searched and shall return the original warrant to the court showing his actions in the premises.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.19; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-119; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to search and seizure generally, see Rule 41, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), inserted “or it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that there is probable cause to believe a child has committed a delinquent act”; and in (b), twice substituted “affidavit shall” for “affidavit must.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

§ 14-6-219.
Physical and mental examinations; involuntary commitment of incompetents; subsequent proceedings.

Any time after the filing of a petition, on motion of the district attorney or the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney or on motion of the court, the court may order the child to be examined by a licensed and qualified physician, surgeon, psychiatrist or psychologist designated by the court to aid in determining the physical and mental condition of the child. The examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis, but the court may commit the child to a suitable medical facility or institution for examination if deemed necessary. Commitment for examination shall not exceed fifteen (15) days. Any time after the filing of a petition, the court on its own motion or motion of the district attorney or the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney, may order the child’s parents, guardians or other custodial members of the child’s family to undergo a substance abuse assessment at the expense of the child’s parents, guardians or other custodial members of the child’s family and to fully comply with all findings and recommendations set forth in the assessment. Failure to comply may result in contempt proceedings as set forth in W.S.

14-6-242

.

If a child has been committed to a medical facility or institution for mental examination prior to adjudication of the petition and if it appears to the court from the mental examination that the child is competent to participate in further proceedings and is not suffering from mental illness or intellectual disability to a degree rendering the child subject to involuntary commitment to the Wyoming state hospital or the Wyoming life resource center, the court shall order the child returned to the court without delay.

If it appears to the court by mental examination conducted before adjudication of the petition that a child alleged to be delinquent is incompetent to participate in further proceedings by reason of mental illness or intellectual disability to a degree rendering the child subject to involuntary commitment to the Wyoming state hospital or the Wyoming life resource center, the court shall hold further proceedings under this act in abeyance. The district attorney shall then commence proceedings in the district court for commitment of the child to the appropriate institution as provided by law.

The juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction of the child on the petition pending final determination of the commitment proceedings in the district court. If proceedings in the district court commit the child to the Wyoming state hospital, the Wyoming life resource center or any other facility or institution for treatment and care of people with a mental illness or an intellectual disability, the petition shall be dismissed and further proceedings under this act terminate. If proceedings in the district court determine the child does not have a mental illness or an intellectual disability to a degree rendering him subject to involuntary commitment, the court shall proceed to a final adjudication of the petition and disposition of the child under the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.20; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-120; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1990, ch. 24, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 2; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 85, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming state hospital and Wyoming state training school, see §§

25-1-201

and

25-5-103

, respectively.

As to hospitalization of mentally ill persons generally, see chapter 10 of title 25.

The 2008 amendments.—

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 70, § 1,
substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (b) and (c); and in (d), substituted “people with a mental illness or an intellectual disability” for “the mentally ill or the mentally retarded” in the second sentence, and substituted “does not have a mental illness or intellectual disability” for “is not mentally ill or mentally retarded” in the third sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, substituted references to intellectual disability for references to mental retardation and made other related changes in (d); and substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” in (b), (c) and (d).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Standards for juvenile proceedings.

Finding that
petitioner, a juvenile, was competent to proceeding to adjudication
in a delinquency proceeding was improper because, although the juvenile
court ordered a competency evaluation and ruled that petitioner was
competent to proceed, it did not evaluate him under the correct standards
set out in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-11-302

and

7-11-303

. The psychologist offered the opinion that he appeared
to be less familiar with general legal terms and concepts than the
average adult defendant, but because he was 12 at the time, the juvenile
should not have been compared to the average adult defendant, but
to an average child of the same age.
SWM v. State, 2013 WY 49, 299 P.3d 673,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2013).

Quoted

in

In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993); AMB v. State, 892 P.2d 799,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 14-6-220.
Emergency medical, surgical or dental examination or treatment.

The court may authorize and consent to emergency medical, surgical or dental examination or treatment of a child taken into custody under the provisions of this act either before or after the filing of a petition, if in the opinion of a licensed and qualified physician or surgeon the child is suffering from a serious physical condition or illness which requires prompt treatment or prompt examination is necessary to preserve evidence of a criminal offense.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.21; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-121; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

§ 14-6-221.
Reports of medical or mental examinations; use of results; copies.

The results of any medical or mental examination authorized or ordered by the court shall be reported to the court in writing and signed by the person making the examination. The results may not be considered by the court prior to adjudication but may be considered only in making a disposition under this act or W.S.

14-6-219

. Copies of the examination reports shall be made available to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney upon request.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.22; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-122; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

§ 14-6-222.
Advising of right to counsel required; appointment of counsel; verification of financial condition.

At their first appearance before the court the child and his parents, guardian or custodian shall be advised by the court of their right to be represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings including appeal, and to employ counsel of their own choice.

The court shall upon request appoint counsel who may be the guardian ad litem to represent the child if the child, his parents, guardian, custodian or other person responsible for the child’s support are unable to obtain counsel. If appointment of counsel is requested, the court shall require the child and his parents, guardian, custodian or other person legally responsible for the child’s support to verify their financial condition under oath, either by written affidavit signed and sworn to by the parties or by sworn testimony made a part of the record of the proceedings. The affidavit or sworn testimony shall state they are without sufficient money, property, assets or credit to employ counsel in their own behalf. The court may require further verification of financial condition if it deems necessary. If the child requests counsel and his parents, guardian, custodian or other person responsible for the child’s support is able but unwilling to obtain counsel for the child, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the child and may direct reimbursement of counsel fees under W.S. 14-6-235(c).

The court may appoint counsel for any party when necessary in the interest of justice.

Counsel representing a child alleged to be delinquent under this act shall consider among other things what is in the best interest of the child.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.23; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-123; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right to assigned counsel and assignment procedure generally, see Rule 44, W.R. Cr. P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Counsel must be effective. —

The fact that counsel was assigned does not satisfy the constitutional requirement; effective assistance must be provided by counsel in the preparation of the case for trial. The standard for review of a claim of ineffective assistance of counsel demands that the juvenile demonstrate both that counsel's performance was deficient, and that the juvenile was prejudiced as a result of that deficient performance. LDO v. State, 858 P.2d 553,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995); Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995); SWM v. State, 2013 WY 49,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Apr 25, 2013); Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Child Protection: A Suggested Role for Members of the Wyoming State Bar,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1974).

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty to advise of right to assistance of counsel, 3 ALR2d 1003.

Right to and appointment of counsel in juvenile court proceedings, 60 ALR2d 691, 25 ALR4th 1072.

§ 14-6-223.
Privilege against self-incrimination; rights of parties generally; demand for and conduct of jury trial.

A child alleged to be delinquent may remain silent and need not be a witness against or otherwise incriminate himself, whether before the court voluntarily, by subpoena or otherwise.

A party to any proceeding under this act is entitled to:

A copy of all charges made against him;

Confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses;

Introduce evidence, present witnesses and otherwise be heard in his own behalf; and

Issue of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses or the production of evidence.

A party against whom a petition has been filed or the district attorney may demand a trial by jury at an adjudicatory hearing. The jury shall be composed of jurors selected, qualified and compensated as provided by law for the trial of civil matters in the district court. The jury may also be selected from the prospective jurors on the base jury list residing within five (5) miles of the city or town where the trial is to be held, whichever the court directs. Demand for a jury trial must be made to the court not later than ten (10) days after the party making the demand is advised of his right to a jury trial. No deposit for jury fees is required. Failure of a party to demand a jury is a waiver of this right.

History:

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.24; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-124; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch 22, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to trial by jury generally, see chapter 11 of title 1.

As to examination of jurors, and alternate jurors, see Rule 47, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

The 2014 amendment,

in (c), substituted “may also be selected from the prospective jurors on the base jury list” for “may be drawn from the jury panel of the district court or a special jury panel may be drawn from ‘jury box number three (3)’ containing the names of persons” in the third sentence.

Cited in

Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017); Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

KAA v. State, 2001 WY 24, 18 P.3d 1159,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissions or confessions; self-incrimination in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 43 ALR2d 1128.

Cross-examination of witnesses in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 43 ALR2d 1128.

Privileged communications in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 43 ALR2d 1128.

Right to jury trial in juvenile court delinquency proceedings, 100 ALR2d 1241.

Applicability of double jeopardy to juvenile court proceedings, 5 ALR4th 234.

§ 14-6-224.
Conduct of hearings generally; exclusion of general public and child; exceptions; consolidations permitted.

Unless a jury trial is demanded, hearings under this act shall be conducted by the court without a jury in an informal but orderly manner and separate from other proceedings not included in W.S.

14-6-203

. The district attorney shall present evidence in support of the petition and otherwise represent the state. If the allegations in the petition are denied, adjudicatory and disposition hearings shall be recorded by the court reporter or by electronic, mechanical or other appropriate means.

Except in hearings to declare a person in contempt of court, the general public are excluded from hearings under this act. Only the parties, counsel for the parties, jurors, witnesses, victims and members of their immediate families and other persons the court finds having a proper interest in the proceedings or in the work of the court shall be admitted. If the court finds it necessary in the best interest of the child, the child may be temporarily excluded from any hearing except while evidence is being received at an adjudicatory hearing in support of the allegations of his delinquency.

Hearings on two (2) or more petitions may be consolidated for purposes of adjudication when the allegations in the petitions pertain to the same act or offense constituting the alleged delinquency. Separate hearings on the petitions may be held thereafter for purposes of disposition.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.25; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-125; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, repealed former (d), pertaining to continuances and deferrals.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Statutes preserve court's discretion to delay hearing. —

Under subsection (a) of this section and § 14-6-226(b), a juvenile court may either proceed immediately or hold a hearing within 60 days, but the statutes also preserve the discretion of the court to do neither if the best interests of the child are served, at least until objection to the delayed hearing is asserted by a litigant. In In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

Applied

in

McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995); LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of double jeopardy to juvenile court proceedings, 5 ALR4th 234.

§ 14-6-225.
Burden of proof required; verdict of jury; effect thereof.

Allegations that a child has committed a delinquent act must be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.

If trial by jury is demanded, the jury shall decide issues of fact raised by the petition and return its verdict as to the truth of the allegations contained in the petition. A finding by the jury that the allegations are true is not deemed a conviction of guilt, but is a determination that judicial intervention is necessary for the best interest and welfare of the child and the public.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.26; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-126; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2.

State's burden of proof in adjudication of child neglect is by preponderance of the evidence.

MP v. State ex rel. CP, 965 P.2d 1155,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1998).

Evidence supported finding of neglect,

where the mother left her children with another family which fed and clothed the children without reimbursement and paid for medication used to treat an ear infection developed by one of the children. In In Interest of N.M., 794 P.2d 564,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1990).

Applied

in

CH v. Campbell County D-PASS, 699 P.2d 830,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981); In Interest of AB, 839 P.2d 386,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1992); SWM v. State, 2013 WY 49,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Apr 25, 2013); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied in

K.C. v. State, 2011 WY 108,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Jul 12, 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Degree of proof in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 43 ALR2d 1128.

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.

§ 14-6-226.
Initial appearance; adjudicatory or transfer hearing; entry of decree and disposition; evidentiary matters; continuance of disposition hearing.

At their initial hearing, which may be held after a detention or shelter care hearing or a transfer hearing, the child and his parents, guardian or custodian shall be advised by the court of their rights under law and as provided in this act. They shall also be advised of the specific allegations in the petition and given an opportunity to admit or deny them, unless motion is made to the court to transfer the allegations of delinquency against the minor to another court. They shall also be advised of the possible liability for costs of treatment or services pursuant to this act or W.S.

25-11-101

through

25-11-108

. It is not necessary at the initial appearance for the district attorney to establish probable cause to believe the allegations in the petition are true. When a detention or shelter care hearing is held in accordance with W.S.

14-6-209

, a separate initial hearing is not required if the child and his parents, guardian or custodian were present at the detention or shelter care hearing and advised by the court as provided in this subsection.

If the allegations of the petition are denied, the court may, with consent of the parties, proceed immediately to hear evidence on the petition or it may set a later time not to exceed sixty (60) days for an adjudicatory or a transfer hearing, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing. In no case shall the court hold the adjudicatory hearing more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed. Only competent, relevant and material evidence shall be admissible at an adjudicatory hearing to determine the truth of the allegations in the petition. If after an adjudicatory hearing the court finds that the allegations in the petition are not established as required by this act, it shall dismiss the petition and order the child released from any detention or shelter care.

If after an adjudicatory hearing or a valid admission or confession the court or jury finds that a child committed the acts alleging him delinquent, it shall enter a decree to that effect stating the jurisdictional facts upon which the decree is based. It may then proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing within sixty (60) days to make proper disposition of the child, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing.

In detention or shelter care hearings, disposition hearings or transfer hearings, all material and relevant evidence helpful in determining questions may be received by the court and relied upon for probative value. The parties or their counsel may examine and controvert written reports received as evidence and cross-examine persons making the reports.

On motion of any party or on its own motion, the court may continue a disposition hearing for a reasonable time not to exceed sixty (60) days to receive reports and other evidence bearing on the disposition to be made. The court shall make an appropriate order for detention or shelter care of the child or for his release from detention or shelter care subject to any terms and conditions the court deems necessary during the period of continuance.

At any time prior to disposition under W.S.

14-6-229

, the court, on motion of any party or on its own motion, may reconsider its order regarding detention, shelter care or conditions of release made under W.S. 14-6-209(d) or 14-6-214(e).

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.27; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-127; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; ch. 177, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b) and (c), added “unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing” at the end of the first and second sentences, respectively, and also in (b) added the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Jurisdiction. —

Juvenile court did not lose subject matter jurisdiction after it failed to hold an adjudicatory hearing within the 90-day statutory deadline of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 14-6-209(c) and 14-6-226(b); because the legislature did not unequivocally state that a juvenile court loses subject matter jurisdiction if the 90-day deadline is not met, the juvenile court did not lose jurisdiction over the case when it held the adjudicatory hearing past the deadline. BC-K v. State, 2022 WY 80, 512 P.3d 634,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2022).

Statutes preserve court's discretion to delay hearing. —

Under subsection (b) of this section and § 14-6-224(a), a juvenile court may either proceed immediately or hold a hearing within 60 days, but the statutes also preserve the discretion of the court to do neither if the best interests of the child are served, at least until objection to the delayed hearing is asserted by a litigant. In In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

Jurisdiction retained beyond 60 days. —

The court was not in error for refusing to grant a parent's motion to dismiss for lack of jurisdiction even though the petition for juvenile abuse/neglect was not adjudicated within 60 days. This section and §

14-6-209

only require that the court shall set a time for a hearing within 60 days. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Post-custody evidence admissible. —

The court was not in error in allowing into evidence at an adjudicatory hearing, under this section, evidence that occurred after the state's taking of the child. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

When express finding of neglect unnecessary. —

A trial court need not make an express finding of neglect under subsection (c) where, under the circumstances, its findings are tantamount to a finding of neglect. State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

No counseling for parents absent their consent. —

When a child is adjudged by the court to be delinquent and is permitted to live in the parents' home, the consent of the parents is required before the court has authority to order the parents to go to counseling or evaluation. In Interest of C. N., 816 P.2d 1282,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1991).

Remedy for failure to set hearing. —

The proper remedy for a failure to set an adjudicatory hearing within the time constraints of §

14-6-209

and this section is a motion to the juvenile court for a prompt hearing brought by the minor through the guardian ad litem, or brought by the parents, guardians or custodian named in the petition as parties to the proceeding; if such a motion is not acted upon in a timely fashion, then a petition for a writ of habeas corpus may be filed in the supreme court seeking release of the minor. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Court need to accept admission at hearing. —

Subsections (a) through (c) of this section and § 14-6-209(c) do not require the juvenile court to accept an admission at the initial hearing or the detention hearing. Nor do they prohibit the juvenile court from continuing those hearings while it conducts a transfer hearing. McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995) (decided prior to 1995 amendments).

Findings of court. —

Without a request for findings under Rule 52, W.R.C.P., the supreme court considers that the general findings by the juvenile court carries with it every finding of fact which is supported by the record. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

In Interest of N.M., 794 P.2d 564,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of rules of evidence in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 43 ALR2d 1128.

Hearsay evidence in juvenile delinquency proceeding, 43 ALR2d 1128.

Defense of infancy in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 83 ALR4th 1135.